Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 124D.901, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Student support personnel aid. (a) The initial student support personnel aid for an independent or special school district equals the greater of the student support personnel allowance times the adjusted pupil units at the district for the current fiscal year or $40,000. The initial student support personnel aid for a charter school equals the greater of the student support personnel allowance times the adjusted pupil units at the charter school for the current fiscal year or $20,000. Aid under this paragraph must be reserved in a fund balance that, beginning in fiscal year 2025, may not exceed the greater of the aid entitlement in the prior fiscal year or the fund balance in the prior fiscal year. (b) The cooperative student support personnel aid for an independent or special school district that is a member of an intermediate school district or other cooperative unit that serves students equals the greater of the cooperative student support allowance times the adjusted pupil units at the district for the current fiscal year or $40,000. If a district is a member of more than one cooperative unit that serves students, the revenue must be allocated among the cooperative units. Aid under this paragraph must not exceed actual expenditures. (c) The student support personnel allowance equals $17.08 for fiscal year 2025, $30.05 for fiscal deleted text begin yearsdeleted text end new text begin yearnew text end 2026 deleted text begin and 2027deleted text end , and $34.32 for fiscal year deleted text begin 2028deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end and later. (d) The cooperative student support allowance equals $0.85 for fiscal year 2025 and $1.60 for fiscal year 2026 and later. Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for additional student support personnel aid. new text end